Oklahoma, session 2025, SB316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 26 O.S. 2021, Section 7-114, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 7-114. A. Each person appearing to vote shall announce


that person’s name to the judge of the precinct and shall provide


proof of identity, whereupon the judge shall determine whether the


person’s name is in the precinct registry. As used in this section,


“proof of identity” shall mean a document that satisfies all of the


following:


1. The document shows the name of the person to whom the


document was issued, and the name substantially conforms to the name


in the precinct registry;

Req. No. 1000 Page 1


2. The document shows a photograph of the person to whom the


document was issued;


3. The document includes an expiration date, which is after the


date of the election in which the person is appearing to vote. The


provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to:


a. an identification card that is valid indefinitely, or


b. an identification card issued by a branch of the armed


services of the United States to a person who is a


member of such branch or is retired therefrom; and


4. The document was issued by the United States, the State of


Oklahoma or the government of a federally recognized Indian tribe or


nation.


Provided, if the person presents a voter identification card


issued by the appropriate county election board, such card may serve


as proof of identity without meeting the requirements of paragraphs


and 3 of this subsection. Provided, however, beginning January 1,


2026, each person appearing to vote shall present proof of identity


that meets all the requirements of paragraphs 1 through 4 of this


subsection. Service Oklahoma, in consultation with the Secretary of


the State Election Board, shall develop a voter identification card


that includes a photograph of the person to whom the card is issued


and is in compliance with the requirements of this subsection. The


voter identification card shall be provided free of charge and may


only be used for voting purposes.

Req. No. 1000 Page 2


B. 1. If a person declines to or is unable to produce proof of


identity, the person may sign a statement under oath, in a form


approved by the Secretary of the State Election Board, swearing or


affirming that the person is the person identified on the precinct


registry, and shall be allowed to cast a provisional ballot in a


manner consistent with the provisions of Section 7-116.1 of this


title.


2. A provisional ballot cast by a voter who declines or is


unable to produce proof of identity shall only be considered


verified and approved for counting if:


a. the voter’s name on the affidavit substantially


conforms to the voter’s name in the voter registration


database, except as provided in paragraph 3 of this


subsection,


b. the voter’s residence address on the affidavit


substantially conforms to the voter’s residence


address in the voter registration database, except as


provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection,


c. the voter’s date of birth matches the information in


the voter registration database,


d. the voter’s Oklahoma driver license number or the last


four digits of the voter’s Social Security number on


the affidavit matches the information in the voter


registration database. The provisions of this

Req. No. 1000 Page 3


subparagraph shall not apply if the voter was not


required to provide a driver license number or the


last four digits of the voter’s Social Security number


at the time of registration, and


e. the provisional ballot meets the eligibility


requirements set forth in Section 7-116.1 of this


title.


3. A voter casting a provisional ballot as provided in this


section who has legally changed his or her name, but has not updated


the name on the voter registry, may note this fact on the affidavit


and submit a form prescribed by the Secretary of the State Election


Board to update his or her name. In such a case, and where the


requirements of Section 4-117 of this title are satisfied, the


provisional ballot shall be deemed to meet the requirements of


subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of this subsection.


4. A voter casting a provisional ballot as provided in this


section who has changed his or her address of residence, but has not


updated the address on the voter registry, may note this fact on the


affidavit and submit a form to update the address prescribed by the


Secretary of the State Election Board. In such a case, and where


the requirements of Section 4-117 of this title are satisfied, the


provisional ballot shall be deemed to meet the requirements of


subparagraph a b of paragraph 2 of this subsection.



Req. No. 1000 Page 4


5. False swearing or affirming under oath shall be punishable


as a felony as provided in Section 16-103 of this title, and the


penalty shall be distinctly set forth on the face of the statement.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1000 TEK 12/31/2024 10:12:35 AM





































Req. No. 1000 Page 5